Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3505.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [290.0696] CREDIT FOR RECEIPT OF NATIONAL INSTITUTES OF HEALTH FUNDING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Credit allowed. new text end new text begin An eligible institution is allowed a credit against the tax imposed under this chapter equal to 25 percent of the amount of grants received from the National Institutes of Health in the taxable year. For purposes of this section, "eligible institution" means a public postsecondary educational institution as defined in section 136A.1465, subdivision 1, clause (4). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Credit refundable. new text end new text begin If the amount of credit that the taxpayer is eligible to receive under this section exceeds the liability for tax under this chapter, the commissioner shall refund the excess to the taxpayer. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin An amount sufficient to pay the refunds authorized under this section is appropriated to the commissioner from the general fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Manner of claiming. new text end new text begin The commissioner shall prescribe the manner in which the credit may be issued or claimed. This may include allowing the credit only as a separately processed claim for refund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end